Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-20,125
Bylaws; amendment by board of directors or shareholders.

(1) A corporation's board of directors may amend or repeal the corporation's bylaws unless:

(a) The articles of incorporation or the Business Corporation Act reserves this power exclusively to the shareholders in whole or part; or

(b) The shareholders in amending or repealing a particular bylaw provide expressly that the board of directors may not amend or repeal that bylaw.

(2) A corporation's shareholders may amend or repeal the corporation's bylaws even though the bylaws may also be amended or repealed by its board of directors.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 125.